Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 8

Dissenter's Rights

43-38-801. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cooperative” means a cooperative whose members have obtained rights to dissent under § 43-38-802(a), and includes any successor by merger;

“Dissenter” means a member who is entitled to dissent from cooperative action under § 43-38-802(a) and who exercises that right when and in the manner required under this part;

“Fair value” means the value of the dissenter's membership interest of a cooperative immediately before the effective date of the cooperative action referred to in § 43-38-802(a), excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the cooperative action;

“Interest” means interest from the effective date of the action referred to in § 43-38-802(a) that gave rise to the member's right to dissent until the date of payment, at the average auction rate paid on United States treasury bills with a maturity of six (6) months, or the closest maturity to that date, as of the auction date for such treasury bills closest to the effective date; and

“Member” includes a former member when dissenter's rights exist because:

The membership of the former member has terminated causing dissolution; and

The dissolved cooperative has then entered into a merger under § 43-38-122 or § 43-38-123.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-802. Actions entitling member to dissent.

A member of a cooperative is entitled to dissent from and obtain payment of the fair value, as determined under § 43-38-807, of the member's membership interests in the event of any of the following cooperative actions:

Consummation of a plan or merger to which the cooperative is a party;

Consummation of a sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the cooperative not made in the usual or regular course of the cooperative's business, but not including a disposition in dissolution described in § 43-38-1009(b), or a disposition pursuant to an order of a court, or a disposition for cash on terms requiring that all or substantially all of the net proceeds of disposition be distributed to the members in accordance with their respective membership interests within one (1) year after the date of disposition;

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws in effect when the person becomes a member or placed in the agreement without the opposing vote of the member, an amendment of the articles or bylaws that materially and adversely affects the rights or preferences of the membership interests of the dissenting member because it:

Alters or abolishes a preferential right of the membership interests;

Alters or abolishes a preemptive right of the owner of the membership interests to make a contribution;

Excludes or limits the right of a member to vote on a matter, or to cumulate votes, except as the right may be excluded or limited through the acceptance of contributions or the marking of contribution agreements pertaining to membership interests with similar or different voting rights; or

Establishes or changes the conditions for or consequences of expulsion;

An amendment to the articles or bylaws that materially and adversely affects the rights or preferences of the membership interests of the dissenting member because it:

Changes a member's right to resign or retire; or

Alters or abolishes a right in respect of the remedies of the membership interests, including a provision respecting a sinking fund for the redemption or repurchase of membership interests; and

Any other cooperative action taken pursuant to a member vote to the extent the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution approved by the members provides that dissenting members are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their membership interests.

A member entitled to dissent and obtain payment for the member's membership interest under this part may not challenge the cooperative action creating the member's entitlement unless the action is unlawful or fraudulent with respect to the member or the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-803. Submitting action creating dissenter's right to vote.

If proposed cooperative action creating dissenter's rights under § 43-38-802 is submitted to a vote at a members' meeting, the meeting notice must state that members are or may be entitled to assert dissenter's rights under this part and be accompanied by a copy of this part.

If cooperative action creating dissenter's rights under § 43-38-802 is taken without a vote of the members, the cooperative shall notify in writing all members entitled to assert dissenter's rights that the action was taken and send them the dissenter's notice described in § 43-38-805.

A cooperative's failure to give notice pursuant to this section will not invalidate the cooperative action.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-804. Procedure for asserting dissenter's rights.

If proposed cooperative action creating dissenter's rights under § 43-38-802 is submitted to vote at a members' meeting, a member who wishes to assert dissenter's rights:

Must deliver to the cooperative, before the vote is taken, written notice of the member's intent to demand payment for the member's membership interest if the proposed action is effectuated; and

Must not vote the member's membership interest in favor of the proposed action. No written notice of intent to demand payment is required of any member to whom the cooperative failed to provide the notice required by § 43-38-803.

A member who does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) is not entitled to payment for the member's membership interest under this part.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-805. Written notice to members.

If proposed cooperative action creating dissenter's rights under § 43-38-802 is authorized at a members' meeting, the cooperative shall deliver a written dissenter's notice to all members who satisfied the requirements of § 43-38-804.

The dissenter's notice must be sent no later than ten (10) days after the cooperative action was authorized by the members or effectuated, whichever is the first to occur, and must:

State where the payment demand must be sent;

Supply a form for demanding payment that includes the date of the first announcement to news media or to members of the principal terms of the proposed cooperative action and requires that the person asserting dissenter's rights certify whether or not the member acquired membership interest before that date;

Set a date by which the cooperative must receive the payment demand, which date may not be fewer than one (1) nor more than two (2) months after the date required in subsection (a) is delivered; and

Be accompanied by a copy of this part, if the cooperative has not previously sent a copy of this part to the member pursuant to § 43-38-803.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-806. Duty to demand payment.

A member sent a dissenter's notice described in § 43-38-805 must demand payment and certify whether the member acquired the membership interest before the date required to be set forth in the dissenter's notice pursuant to § 43-38-805(b)(2).

The member who demands payment under subsection (a) retains all other rights of a member until these rights are cancelled or modified by the effectuation of the proposed cooperative action.

A member who does not demand payment by the date set in the dissenter's notice is not entitled to payment for the member's membership interest under this part.

A demand for payment filed by a member may not be withdrawn unless the cooperative with which it was filed, or the surviving cooperative consents to the withdrawal.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-807. Payment of fair value of dissenter's membership interest.

Except as provided in § 43-38-809, as soon as the proposed cooperative action is effectuated, or upon receipt of a payment demand, whichever is later, the cooperative shall pay each dissenter who complied with § 43-38-806 the amount the cooperative estimates to be the fair value of the dissenter's membership interest, plus accrued interest.

The payment must be accompanied by:

The cooperative's balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen (16) months before the date of payment, an income statement for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any;

A statement of the cooperative estate of the fair value of the membership interests;

An explanation of how the value of the membership interest was calculated;

A statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under § 43-38-810; and

A copy of this part, if the cooperative has not previously sent a copy of this part to the member pursuant to § 43-38-803 or § 43-38-805.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-808. Failure to take action.

If the cooperative does not effectuate the proposed action that gave rise to the dissenter's rights within two (2) months after the date set for demanding payment, the cooperative must send a new dissenter's notice under § 43-38-804 and repeat the payment demand procedure if it effectuates the proposed action.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-809. After-acquired shares.

A cooperative may elect to withhold payment required by § 43-38-807 from a dissenter unless the dissenter was a member before the date set forth in the dissenters' notice as of the date of the first announcement to news media or to members of the principal terms of the proposed cooperative action.

To the extent the cooperative elects not to withhold payment under subsection (a), after effectuating the proposed cooperative action, it shall estimate the fair value of the membership interest, plus accrued interest, and shall pay this amount to each dissenter who agrees to accept it in full satisfaction of the dissenter's demand. The cooperative shall send with its offer a statement of its estimate of the fair value of the membership interest, an explanation of how the interest was calculated, and a statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under § 43-38-810.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-810. Procedure if dissenter dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A dissenter may notify the cooperative in writing of the dissenter's own estimate of the fair value of the dissenter's membership interest and amount of interest due, and demand payment of the dissenter's estimate, less any payment under § 43-38-807, or reject the cooperative offer under § 43-38-809 and demand payment of the fair value of membership interest and interest due, if:

The dissenter believes that the amount paid under § 43-38-807 or offered under § 43-38-809 is less than the fair value of the dissenter's membership interest or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated; or

The cooperative fails to make payment under § 43-38-807 within two (2) months after the date set for demanding payment.

A dissenter waives the right to demand payment under this section unless the dissenter notifies the cooperative of the dissenter's demand in writing under subsection (a) within one (1) month after the cooperative made or offered payment for the dissenter's membership interest.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-811. Judicial appraisal of shares.

If a demand for payment under § 43-38-810 remains unsettled, the cooperative shall commence a proceeding within two (2) months after receiving the payment demand and petition the court to determine the fair value of the membership interest and accrued interest. If the cooperative does not commence the proceeding within the two-month period, it shall pay each dissenter whose demand remains unsettled the amount demanded.

The cooperative shall commence the proceeding in a court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where the cooperative's principal executive office, or, if none in this statement, its registered office, is located.

The cooperative shall make all dissenters, whether or not residents of this state, whose demands remain unsettled, parties to the proceeding as an action against their membership interests, and all parties must be served with a copy of the petition. Nonresidents may be served by registered or certified mail or by publication as provided by law.

The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced under subsection (b) is plenary and exclusive. The court may appoint one (1) or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers have the powers described in the order appointing them, or in any amendment to it. The dissenters are entitled to the same discovery rights as parties in other civil proceedings.

Each dissenter made a party to the proceeding is entitled to judgment:

For the amount, if any, by which the court finds the fair value of the dissenter's membership interest plus accrued interest exceeds the amount paid by the cooperative; or

For the fair value, plus accrued interest, or the dissenter's after-acquired membership interests for which the cooperative elected to withhold payment under § 43-38-809.

The cooperative is entitled to judgment against each specific dissenter for the amount, if any, by which the court finds the fair value of the dissenter's membership interest, plus accrued interest, is less than the amount paid by the cooperative to each dissenter.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-812. Costs and fees of judicial appraisal.

The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under § 43-38-811 shall determine all costs of the proceeding including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court. The court shall assess the costs against the cooperative, except that the court may assess costs against all or some of the dissenters, in amounts the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds the dissenters acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith in demanding payment under § 43-38-810.

The court may also assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the respective parties in amounts the court finds equitable:

Against the cooperative and in favor of any or all dissenters if the court finds the cooperative did not substantially comply with the requirements of §§ 43-38-802 — 43-38-810.

Against either the cooperative or a dissenter, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom the fees and expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this part.

If the court finds that the services of counsel for any dissenter were of substantial benefit to other dissenters similarly situated, and that the fees for those services should not be assessed against the cooperative, the court may award to counsel reasonable fees to be paid out of the amounts awarded to the dissenters who were benefited.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.

43-38-813. Procedures as to assignees of financial rights.

When an assignment of some or all of the financial rights of a membership is in effect and a copy delivered to the cooperative prior to the time described in § 43-38-807, then as to that membership interest §§ 43-38-801 — 43-38-812 must be followed, subject to the following:

All rights to be exercised and actions to be taken by a member under §§ 43-38-802 — 43-38-812 shall be taken by the member and not by any assignee of the member's financial rights. As between the cooperative and the assignees, the actions taken or omitted by the member bind the assignees;

Instead of remitting a payment under § 43-38-807, the cooperative shall forward to the dissenter member:

The materials described in § 43-38-807(b);

An offer to pay the amount listed in the materials, with that amount to be allocated among and paid to the member and the assignees of financial rights according to the terms of the assignments reflected in the required records; and

A statement of that allocation;

If the dissenter member accepts the amount of the offer made under subdivision (2) but disputes the allocation, the dissenter shall promptly so notify the cooperative and promptly after notification bring an action to determine the proper allocation. The suit must be filed in the county in which the registered office of the cooperative is located. The suit must name as parties the member, the cooperative and all assignees of the members financial rights. Upon being served with the action, the cooperative shall promptly pay into the court the amount offered under subdivision (2) and shall then be dismissed from the action;

If the dissenter considers the amount offered under subdivision (2) inadequate, the dissenter may decline the offer and demand payment under § 43-38-810. If the dissenter makes demand, §§ 43-38-811 and 43-38-812 apply, with the court having jurisdiction also to determine the correctness of the allocation; and

If the member fails to take action under either subdivision (3) or (4), then:

As to the cooperative, both the member and the assignees of the member's financial rights are limited to the amount and allocation offered under subdivision (2); and

The cooperative discharges its obligation of payment by making payment according to the amount and allocation offered under subdivision (2).

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 27.